Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.115

Discontinuing plan contributions—One-time irrevocable election.

Beginning January 1, 2007, through December 31, 2007, any member of the public employees' retirement system eligible to participate in the judicial retirement account plan under this chapter may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department of retirement systems, and the administrative office of the courts, to discontinue future contributions to the judicial retirement account plan in lieu of prospective contribution and benefit provisions under chapter 189, Laws of 2006.

[ 2006 c 189 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: "This act takes effect January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 189 s 20.]